Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF747.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2787YH (2) 91 as/js H.F. 747 Section 1. Section 80.45, subsection 3, paragraph h, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 h. By November 1, 2017, and annually thereafter, submit 3 a Submit an annual written report by November 1 to the 4 general assembly regarding the officeâs activities related 5 to combatting human trafficking and occurrences of human 6 trafficking within this state , and that includes the findings 7 and recommendations provided by the human trafficking task 8 force pursuant to section 80.45B, subsection 5 . 9 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 80.45B Human trafficking task force. 10 1. The commissioner shall establish, by January 30, 2026, a 11 task force that shall do all of the following: 12 a. Collaborate with the office to combat human trafficking. 13 b. Identify current services available in the state to 14 victims of human trafficking. 15 c. Develop information and materials available to the public 16 to educate members of the public on ways to provide assistance 17 to a person who may be a victim of human trafficking. 18 d. Report on findings and make recommendations in the report 19 submitted to the general assembly under subsection 5. 20 2. The task force shall consist of the following members: 21 a. The commissioner or the commissionerâs designee. 22 b. The coordinator of the office to combat human 23 trafficking. 24 c. The director of the law enforcement academy or the 25 directorâs designee. 26 d. The attorney general or the attorney generalâs designee. 27 e. The director of the department of corrections or the 28 directorâs designee. 29 f. The director of the department of education or the 30 directorâs designee. 31 g. The following members who shall be appointed by the 32 governor: 33 (1) The chief of police or head law enforcement official of 34 a city in this state with a population of two hundred thousand 35 -1- LSB 2787YH (2) 91 as/js 1/ 4 H.F. 747 or more as determined by the most recent population estimates 1 issued by the United States bureau of census. 2 (2) The chief of police or head law enforcement official of 3 a city in this state with a population of less than two hundred 4 thousand as determined by the most recent population estimates 5 issued by the United States bureau of census. 6 (3) A county sheriff. 7 (4) A county supervisor. 8 (5) A county attorney. 9 (6) A mayor or city manager. 10 (7) An individual involved with the control or prevention of 11 juvenile delinquency in the state. 12 (8) An individual involved with the control or prevention of 13 child abuse in the state. 14 (9) Six members from the general public, at least three of 15 whom are female, that includes all of the following: 16 (a) A professional involved with child welfare issues. 17 (b) A professional involved with juvenile delinquency 18 proceedings. 19 (c) An individual who resides in a rural area. 20 (d) An individual who resides in an urban area. 21 3. a. The members of the task force appointed by the 22 governor shall serve six-year terms, except that of the members 23 first appointed, four shall serve an initial two-year term, 24 four shall serve an initial four-year term, and six shall serve 25 an initial six-year term. Thereafter, all other appointed 26 members shall serve a six-year term. 27 b. The governor shall appoint a new member to fill a vacancy 28 that occurs before the end of the term of a member appointed by 29 the governor, and the newly appointed member shall serve for 30 the remaining period of the term. 31 c. A member of the task force may be appointed to serve more 32 than one term. 33 d. A member shall not continue to serve on the task force 34 beyond the date at which the member no longer holds the office, 35 -2- LSB 2787YH (2) 91 as/js 2/ 4 H.F. 747 employment, or status by which the member had been eligible to 1 serve on the task force. 2 e. A member of the task force appointed by the governor 3 may be removed from the task force for being absent from three 4 regularly scheduled meetings of the task force during any 5 six-month period. 6 f. Eleven members of the task force shall constitute a 7 quorum and the task force shall have the power to act by a 8 majority of the members present at any meeting at which a 9 quorum is present. 10 4. The commissioner or the commissionerâs designee shall 11 serve as the chairperson of the task force. 12 5. The commissioner or the commissionerâs designee shall 13 provide the findings and recommendations of the task force 14 to the coordinator of the office of human trafficking for 15 inclusion in the annual report submitted by the office to the 16 general assembly pursuant to section 80.45, subsection 3, 17 paragraph âhâ . 18